Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5223
Act, how cited.

Sections
44-5223 to 44-5267 shall be known and may be cited as the Small Employer Health
Insurance Availability Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 30;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 33;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 29;

Laws 2009, LB192, § 5.